Hawaii statutes.
§490:8-209 Issuer's lien. A lien in
favor of an issuer upon a certificated security is valid against a purchaser
only if the right of the issuer to the lien is noted conspicuously on the
security certificate. [L 1997, c 33, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next